Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle B. Filing Documents.

§79-4-1.20.
Filing requirements.

A document must satisfy the requirements of this section, and of any other section that adds to or varies these requirements, to be entitled to filing by the Secretary of State.

Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. must require or permit filing the document in the Office of the Secretary of State.

The document must contain the information required by Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. It may contain other information as well.

The document must be typewritten or printed, or, if electronically transmitted, it must be in a format that can be retrieved or reproduced by the Secretary of State in typewritten or printed form.

The document must be in the English language. A corporate name need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals, and the certificate of existence required of foreign corporations need not be in English if accompanied by a reasonably authenticated English translation.

The document must be executed:

By the chairman of the board of directors of a domestic or foreign corporation, by its president, or by another of its officers;

If directors have not been selected or the corporation has not been formed, by an incorporator; or

If the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

The following provisions of a plan or filed document may not be made dependent on facts outside the plan or filed document:

If a provision of a filed document is made dependent on a fact ascertainable outside of the filed document, and that fact is not ascertainable by reference to a source described in subsection (k)(2)(i) or a document that is a matter of public record, or the affected shareholders have not received notice of the fact from the corporation, then the corporation shall file with the Secretary of State articles of amendment setting forth the fact promptly after the time when the fact referred to is first ascertainable or thereafter changes. Articles of amendment under this subsection (k)(5) are deemed to be authorized by the authorization of the original filed document or plan to which they relate and may be filed by the corporation without further action by the board of directors or the shareholders.

The person executing the document shall sign it and state beneath or opposite his signature his name and the capacity in which he signs. The document may but need not contain a corporate seal, an attestation, acknowledgment or verification. A document required or permitted to be filed under this chapter which contains a copy of a signature, however made, is acceptable for filing.

If the Secretary of State has prescribed a mandatory form for the document under Section 79-4-1.21, the document must be in or on the prescribed form.

The document must be delivered to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing. Delivery may be made by electronic transmission if, to the extent and in the manner permitted by the Secretary of State. If it is filed in typewritten or printed form and not transmitted electronically, the Secretary of State may require one (1) exact or conformed copy to be delivered with the document.

When the document is delivered to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing, the correct filing fee, and any franchise tax, license fee, or penalty required to be paid therewith by this section or any other law must be paid or provision for payment made in a manner permitted by the Secretary of State.

Whenever a provision of this chapter permits any of the terms of a plan or a filed document to be dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan or filed document, the following provisions apply:

The manner in which the facts will operate upon the terms of the plan or filed document shall be set forth in the plan or filed document.

The facts may include, but are not limited to:

Any of the following that is available in a nationally recognized news or information medium either in print or electronically: statistical or market indices, market prices of any security or group of securities, interest rates, currency exchange rates, or similar economic or financial data;

A determination or action by any person or body, including the corporation or any other party to a plan or filed document; or

The terms of, or actions taken under, an agreement to which the corporation is a party, or any other agreement or document.

As used in this subsection:

“Filed document” means a document filed with the Secretary of State under any provision of this chapter except Article 15 or Section 79-4-16.21; and

“Plan” means a plan of domestication, nonprofit conversion, entity conversion, merger or share exchange.

The name and address of any person required in a filed document.

[Reserved]

The registered agent of any entity required in a filed document.

The number of authorized shares and designation of each class or series of shares.

The effective date of a filed document.

Any required statement in a filed document of the date on which the underlying transaction was approved or the manner in which that approval was given.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.20; Laws, 1995, ch. 362, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 495, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 20, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

At the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation, errors in two statutory references in (k)(3)(i) were corrected by substituting “Article 15” for “Chapter 15” and “Section 79-4-16.21” for “Section 16.21.”

The 2004 amendment substituted “acknowledgment” for “acknowledgement” in (g); and added (k).

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted “except as provided in Sections 79-4-5.03 and 79-4-15.09.” from the end of (i); and made minor stylistic changes.

Filing service and copying fees, see § 79-4-1.22

Correcting a filed document, see § 79-4-1.24.

Penalty for signing false document, see § 79-4-1.29.

Copy of records to be maintained at principal office, see § 79-4-16.01.

§79-4-1.21.
Forms.

The Secretary of State may prescribe and furnish on request forms for: (1) an application for a certificate of existence, (2) a foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, (3) a foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of withdrawal and (4) the annual report. If the Secretary of State so requires, use of these forms is mandatory.

The Secretary of State may prescribe and furnish on request forms for other documents required or permitted to be filed by Sections 79-4-1.01 et seq. but their use is not mandatory.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.21, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Necessity that documents that Secretary of State has prescribed a mandatory form for under this section be filed in or on that prescribed form, see § 79-4-1.20.

Collection of filing fee greater than fee set out in § 79-4-1.22 authorized if prescribed form not used, see § 79-4-1.22.

§79-4-1.22.
Filing service and copying fees; discounts; expedited filing service.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this subsection are delivered to him for filing:

Document Fee (1) Articles of incorporation $ 50.00 (2) [Reserved] (3) Application for reserved name 25.00 (4) Notice of transfer or cancellation of reserved name 25.00 (5) [Reserved] (6) [Reserved] (7) [Reserved] (8) [Reserved] (9) [Reserved] (10) Amendment of articles of Incorporation 50.00 (11) Restatement of articles of incorporation 50.00 with amendment of articles 50.00 (12) Articles of merger or share exchange 50.00 (13) Articles of dissolution 25.00 (14) Articles of revocation of dissolution 25.00 (15) Certificate of administrative dissolution No fee (16) Application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution 50.00 (17) Certificate of reinstatement No fee (18) Certificate of judicial dissolution No fee (19) Application for certificate of authority 500.00 (20) Application for amended certificate of authority 50.00 (21) Application for certificate of withdrawal 25.00 (22) Certificate of revocation of authority to transact business No fee (23) Application for reinstatement following administrative revocation 100.00 (24) Certificate of reinstatement No fee (25) Annual report 25.00 (26) Articles of correction 50.00 (27) Application for certificate of existence or authorization 25.00 (28) Any other document required or permitted to be filed by et seq. 25.00 Section 79-4-1.01

Click to view

The Secretary of State shall collect a fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) each time process is served on him under Section 79-4-1.01 et seq. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if he prevails in the proceeding.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees for copying and certifying the copy of any filed document relating to a domestic or foreign corporation:

One Dollar ($1.00) a page for copying; and

Ten Dollars ($10.00) for the certificate.

The Secretary of State may collect a filing fee greater than the fee set out herein, not to exceed the actual costs of processing the filing, if the form for filing as prescribed by the Secretary of State has not been used.

The Secretary of State may promulgate rules to:

Reduce the filing fees prescribed in this section or provide for discounts of fees to encourage online filing of documents or for other reasons as determined by the Secretary of State; and

Provide for documents to be filed and accepted on an expedited basis upon the request of the applicant. The Secretary of State may promulgate rules to provide for an additional reasonable filing fee not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) to be paid by the applicant and collected by the Secretary of State for the expedited filing services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.22; Laws, 1991, ch. 509, § 6; Laws, 1994, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 530, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 375, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 21; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 468, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

Section 1 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 24, 2012), amended this section. Section 21 of Chapter 382, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 17, 2012), also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 1 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, which contains language that specifically provides that it supersedes
§ 79-4-1.22 as amended by
Laws of 2012, ch. 382.

Laws of 2010, ch. 375, § 2, provides:

The 2009 amendment, substituted “costs of processing the filing, if the form for filing as prescribed” for “costs of processing such filing, if the form for such filing prescribed” in (d); and added (e).

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(10) through (a)(12), substituted “50.00” for “0.00”; and in (a)(13) and (a)(28), substituted “25.00” for “5.00.”

The second 2012 amendment (ch. 481) effective January 1, 2013, inserted “or cancellation” in (a)(4) and rewrote (a)(7), (8) and (9).

Definitions of terms used in the Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-1.40.

Filing fees for nonprofit corporation, see § 79-11-109.

§79-4-1.23.
Effective time and date of document.

Except as provided in subsection (b) and Section 79-4-1.24(c), a document accepted for filing is effective:

At the date and time of filing, as evidenced by such means as the Secretary of State may use for the purpose of recording the date and time of filing; or

At the time specified in the document as its effective time on the date it is filed.

A document may specify a delayed effective time and date, and if it does so the document becomes effective at the time and date specified. If a delayed effective date but no time is specified, the document is effective at the close of business on that date. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than the ninetieth day after the date it is filed.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, any document that has a delayed effective time and date shall not become effective if, prior to the effective time and date, a statement of withdrawal is filed with the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.23; Laws, 1994, ch. 417 § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Effective date of articles of correction, see § 79-4-1.24.

Effective date of nonprofit corporations’s filed documents, see § 79-11-111.

§79-4-1.24.
Correcting filed document.

A domestic or foreign corporation may correct a document filed by the Secretary of State if (1) the document contains an inaccuracy, or (2) the document was defectively executed, attested, sealed, verified or acknowledged, or (3) the electronic transmission was defective.

A document is corrected:

By preparing articles of correction that (i) describe the document (including its filing date) or attach a copy of it to the articles, (ii) specify the inaccuracy or defect to be corrected, and (iii) correct the inaccuracy or defect; and

By delivering the articles to the Secretary of State for filing.

Articles of correction are effective on the effective date of the document they correct except as to persons relying on the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the correction. As to those persons, articles of correction are effective when filed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.24; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Fee for filing articles of correction, see § 79-4-1.22.

Effective time and date of documents accepted for filing other than articles of correction, see § 79-4-1.23.

§79-4-1.25.
Duty of Secretary of State.

If a document delivered to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing satisfies the requirements of Section 79-4-1.20, the Secretary of State shall file it.

The Secretary of State files a document by recording it as filed on the date and time of receipt. After filing a document, the Secretary of State shall deliver to the domestic or foreign corporation or its representative a copy of the document with an acknowledgment of the date and time of filing.

If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document, he shall return it to the domestic or foreign corporation or its representative within ten (10) days after the document was delivered, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for his refusal.

The Secretary of State’s duty to file documents under this section is ministerial. His filing or refusing to file a document does not:

Affect the validity or invalidity of the document, in whole or in part;

Relate to the correctness or incorrectness of information contained in the document;

Create a presumption that the document is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or incorrect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.25; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 22; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

Section 2 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 24, 2012), amended this section. Section 22 of Chapter 382, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013 (approved April 17, 2012), also amended this section. As set out above, this section reflects the language of Section 2 of Chapter 481, Laws of 2012, which contains language that specifically provides that it supersedes § 79-4-1.25 as amended by Laws of 2012, ch. 382.

The first 2012 amendment (ch. 382), deleted “except as provided in Sections 79-4-5.03 and 79-4-15.09” preceding “the Secretary of State shall deliver” in the last sentence of (b).

Filing service and copying fees, see § 79-4-1.22.

Appeal from Secretary of State’s refusal to file document, see § 79-4-1.25.

§79-4-1.26.
Appeal from Secretary of State’s refusal to file document.

If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document delivered to his office for filing, the domestic or foreign corporation may appeal the refusal to the chancery court of the county where the corporation’s principal office is or will be located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state. The appeal is commenced by petitioning the court to compel filing the document and by attaching to the petition the document and the Secretary of State’s explanation of his refusal to file.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to file the document or take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.26; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 23, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment , effective January 1, 2013, rewrote the first sentence in (a).

Duty of Secretary of State regarding filing of document, see § 79-4-1.25.

§79-4-1.27.
Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document.

A certificate from the Secretary of State delivered with a copy of the document filed by the Secretary of State, is conclusive evidence that the original document is on file with the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.27; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Evidentiary effect of certificate of existence or authorization, see § 79-4-1.28.

§79-4-1.28.
Certificate of existence.

Anyone may apply to the Secretary of State to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic corporation or a certificate of authorization for a foreign corporation.

A certificate of existence or authorization sets forth:

The domestic corporation’s corporate name or the foreign corporation’s corporate name used in this state;

That (i) the domestic corporation is duly incorporated under the law of this state, the date of its incorporation and the period of its duration, if less than perpetual; or (ii) that the foreign corporation is authorized to transact business in this state;

That all fees, taxes and penalties owed to this state have been paid, if (i) payment is reflected in the records of the Secretary of State; and (ii) nonpayment affects the existence or authorization of the domestic or foreign corporation;

That its most recent annual report required by Section 79-4-16.22 has been delivered to the Secretary of State;

That articles of dissolution have not been filed; and

Other facts of record in the office of the Secretary of State that may be requested by the applicant.

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of existence or authorization issued by the Secretary of State may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign corporation is in existence or is authorized to transact business in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.28, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Application for certificate of existence or authorization fee, see § 79-4-1.22.

Penalty for signing false document, see § 79-4-1.29.

§79-4-1.29.
Penalty for signing false document.

A person commits an offense if he signs a document he knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 1.29; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 3, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00)” for “Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).”

Penalty for signing false document, non profit corporation, see § 79-11-123.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1612 et seq., 1642, 1643.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 924, 977.

Section 79-4-16.21, referred to in (k)(3)(i), was repealed by Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 48, effective January 1, 2013.

Requirement that Secretary of State file document that satisfies the requirements of this section, see § 79-4-1.25.

Definitions of certain terms used in this section, see § 79-4-1.40.

Requirements for filing documents by non profit corporation, see § 79-11-105.

Secretary of State may prescribe forms for use by nonprofit corporation, see § 79-11-107.

“SECTION 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2009.”

The first 2012 amendment (ch. 382), rewrote (a)(7) through (a)(9).

The 2014 amendment, in (2), substituted “[Reserved]” for “Application for use of indistinguishable name . . . 25.00”; in (5), substituted “[Reserved]” for “Application for registered name . . . 50.00”; and in (6), substituted “[Reserved]” for “Application for renewal of registered name . . . 50.00.”

The second 2012 amendment (ch. 481), effective January 1, 2013, deleted “except as provided in Sections 79-4-5.03 and 79-4-15.09” preceding “the Secretary of State shall deliver” in the last sentence of (b); substituted “ten (10)” for “five (5)” preceding “days after the document” in (c); and made minor stylistic changes.

Duty of Secretary of State to file nonprofit corporation documents, see § 79-11-115.

Appeal from Secretary of State’s refusal to file nonprofit corporation document, see § 79-11-117.

Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document, see § 79-4-1.27.

Application for and contents of certificate of existence for nonprofit corporation, see § 79-11-121.

Imposition of standard state assessment in addition to all court imposed fines or other penalties for any misdemeanor violation, see § 99-19-73.